District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.02

Board of Elections authority.

(a)

The Board of Elections shall conduct the charter referendum and certify the results thereof as provided in this part.

(b)

Notwithstanding the fact that such section does not otherwise take effect unless the charter is accepted under this subchapter, the applicable provision of part E of this subchapter shall govern the Board of Elections in the performance of its duties under this chapter.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 702